Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-619
Society names and emblems; registration; record.

The Secretary of State shall keep a properly indexed record of the registration provided for by sections 21-617 and 21-618, which record shall also show any altered or canceled registration.

Laws 1929, c. 140, § 3, p. 497;

C.S.1929, § 24-616;

R.S.1943, § 21-619.